Tennessee, session 114, HB2252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-11-102(a)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivision (A) and substituting:
(A) The name, address, phone number, and email address of the livestock
market operator;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2252
012418
- 1 -